Hawaii statutes.
PART X.
SCRAP DEALERS

Note

Sections 445-231 to 445-235 designated as Part X by L 1990, c
164, §28.

Assessment under §26H-4 removed. L 1992, c 232, §1.

§445-231 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Beer keg" means a metal container
used to hold five gallons or more of liquid that is stamped, engraved,
stenciled, or otherwise marked with the name of a brewery manufacturer;
provided that a deposit beverage container, as defined under section 342G-101,
shall not be considered a beer keg.

"Copper" means copper in all
different forms, including tubing, sheets (includes plates), gutters, down
spouts, bars, bare wire or cable, insulated wire or cable, and aluminum/copper
coil used in air conditioning and refrigeration.

"Scrap" means any secondhand or used
metal except those used motor vehicle parts provided in chapter 289.

"Scrap dealer" means any person
engaged in the business of buying, selling, or dealing in scrap, or any person
operating, carrying on, conducting, or maintaining a scrap yard.

"Scrap yard" means any yard, plot,
space, enclosure, building, or any other place where scrap is collected,
stored, gathered together, and kept.

"Urn" means a container that is or
has been used to hold human ashes. [L 1976, c 230, pt of §2; am L 2007, c 197,
§§1, 7; am L 2008, c 16, §20 and c 53, §§2, 6; am L 2009, c 44, §§1, 2; am L
2016, c 199, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next